Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.047

Director's duties and responsibilities—Amendments to marketing orders or agreements without a referendum—Rules.

(1) The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the director's duties and responsibilities under this chapter including:

(a) The issuance, amendment, or termination of marketing orders or agreements;

(b) Procedural, technical, or administrative rules which may address and include, but are not limited to:

(i) The submission of a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or agreement under this chapter;

(ii) Nominations conducted under this chapter;

(iii) Elections of board members or referenda conducted under this chapter;

(iv) Actions of the director upon a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or agreement;

(c) Rules that provide for a method to fund:

(i) The costs of staff support for all commodity boards and commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if the position is not directly funded by the legislature; and

(ii) The actual costs related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission.

(2) The director may adopt amendments to marketing agreements or orders without conducting a referendum if the amendments are adopted under the following criteria:

(a) The proposed amendments relate only to internal administration of a marketing order or agreement and are not subject to violation by a person;

(b) The proposed amendments adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or rules of other Washington state agencies, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same activities as are authorized under the marketing order or agreement;

(c) The proposed amendments only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing the marketing order or agreement; and

(d) The content of the proposed amendments is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute.

A marketing order or agreement shall not be amended without a referendum to provide that a majority of the commodity board members be appointed by the director.

[ 2002 c 313 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.